Interlingua Spellchecker/InterlinguaSpellCheck/bin/Debug/ia.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX N Y 45
SFX N   a   esime   a       ds:esim po:adj
SFX N   0   sime    e       ds:esim po:adj
SFX N   i   esime   i       ds:esim po:adj
SFX N   o   esime   o       ds:esim po:adj
SFX N   0   esime   [^aeio] ds:esim po:adj
SFX N   a   esimo   a       ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX N   0   simo    e       ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX N   i   esimo   i       ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX N   o   esimo   o       ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX N   0   esimo   [^aeio] ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX N   a   esimemente  a       ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX N   0   simemente   e       ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX N   i   esimemente  i       ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX N   o   esimemente  o       ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX N   0   esimemente  [^aeio] ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX N   a   esime   a       ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX N   0   sime    e       ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX N   i   esime   i       ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX N   o   esime   o       ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX N   0   esime   [^aeio] ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX N   a   esimo   a       ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX N   0   simo    e       ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX N   i   esimo   i       ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX N   o   esimo   o       ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX N   0   esimo   [^aeio] ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX N   a   esima   a       ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX N   0   sima    e       ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX N   i   esima   i       ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX N   o   esima   o       ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX N   0   esima   [^aeio] ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX N   a   esimes  a       ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX N   0   simes   e       ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX N   i   esimes  i       ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX N   o   esimes  o       ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX N   0   esimes  [^aeio] ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX N   a   esimos  a       ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX N   0   simos   e       ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX N   i   esimos  i       ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX N   o   esimos  o       ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX N   0   esimos  [^aeio] ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX N   a   esimas  a       ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX N   0   simas   e       ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX N   i   esimas  i       ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX N   o   esimas  o       ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX N   0   esimas  [^aeio] ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb

SFX O Y 9
SFX O   0   0   e   ds:e po:adj
SFX O   e   o   e   ds:o po:adv
SFX O   0   mente   e   ds:mente po:adv
SFX O   0   0   e   ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX O   e   o   e   ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX O   e   a   e   ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX O   0   s   e   ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX O   e   os  e   ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX O   e   as  e   ds:a is:pl po:sb

SFX P Y 9
SFX P   0  0    [^is]                    is:sg po:pron
SFX P   0  0    is                       is:sg po:pron
SFX P   0  0    [^o]i                    is:sg po:pron
SFX P   0  0    [^i]s                    is:pl po:pron
SFX P   0  0    [nv]oi                   is:pl po:pron
SFX P   0  s    [^ioucjgmnst][aeo]       is:pl po:pron
SFX P   0  s    [aoumnrst][iucjnst][aeo] is:pl po:pron
SFX P   0  es   [lrn]                    is:pl po:pron
SFX P   0  hes  [pa][ou]c                is:pl po:pron

SFX Q Y 7
SFX Q   0  0      .      ds:e po:adj
SFX Q   0  0/_P   [^iur] ds:e
SFX Q   0  e/_P   [iur]  ds:e
SFX Q   e  o/_P   e      ds:o
SFX Q   e  a/_P   e      ds:a
SFX Q   0  o/_P   [^e]   ds:o
SFX Q   0  a/_P   [^e]   ds:a

SFX R Y 2
SFX R   0  0      .   ds:e po:adj
SFX R   0  0/_P   .   ds:e

SFX S Y 4
SFX S   0  0    .           is:sg po:sb
SFX S   0  s    [aáeéiouy]   is:pl po:sb
SFX S   0  es   [^aáeéiouyc] is:pl po:sb
SFX S   0  hes  c           is:pl po:sb

SFX T Y 27
SFX T   0   0       .               is:sg po:sb
SFX T   ice ex      ice             is:sg po:sb
SFX T   ce  x       [ay]ce          is:sg po:sb
SFX T   de  s       ide             is:sg po:sb
SFX T   ge  x       ge              is:sg po:sb
SFX T   che x       che             is:sg po:sb
SFX T   e   is      [^c]he          is:sg po:sb
SFX T   e   is      [blmnrstvx]e    is:sg po:sb
SFX T   0   s       e               is:pl po:sb
SFX T   um  a       um              is:pl po:sb
SFX T   on  a       on              is:pl po:sb
SFX T   und ünde   und             is:pl po:sb
SFX T   opf öpfe   opf             is:pl po:sb
SFX T   ock öcke   ock             is:pl po:sb
SFX T   ack äcke   ack             is:pl po:sb
SFX T   ann änner  ann             is:pl po:sb
SFX T   aus äuser  aus             is:pl po:sb
SFX T   aps äpse   aps             is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   er      [se][td]        is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   en      nz              is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   se      [tn]is          is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [^iup]s         is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [^tn]is         is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [^s]t           is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [^i]st          is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [^eoun][dnz]    is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [ghlv]       is:pl po:sb

SFX U Y 15
SFX U   0   0   .           is:sg po:sb
SFX U   y   ies [^aeiou]y   is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   s   [aeiou]y    is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   s   [^ufns]     is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   s   [^ae]u      is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   x   [ae]u       is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   s   [^l]f       is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   s   [^ea]lf     is:pl po:sb
SFX U   f   ves [ea]lf      is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   s   [^a]n       is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   s   [^m]an      is:pl po:sb
SFX U   an  en  [^l]man     is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   s   lman        is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   x   [ae]u       is:pl po:sb
SFX U   0   0   s           is:pl po:sb

SFX V Y 30
SFX V   r   r/_S    ar  ds:a is:inf
SFX V   r   r/_S    er  ds:e is:inf
SFX V   r   r/_S    ir  ds:i is:inf
SFX V   r   nte/_F  ar  ds:a is:act
SFX V   r   nte/_F  er  ds:e is:act
SFX V   r   ente/_F ir  ds:i is:act
SFX V   r   ntissime/_B     ar  ds:a is:act ds:issim
SFX V   r   ntissime/_B     er  ds:e is:act ds:issim
SFX V   r   entissime/_B    ir  ds:i is:act ds:issim
SFX V   r   te/_B       ar  ds:a is:pass
SFX V   er  ite/_B      er  ds:i is:pass
SFX V   r   te/_B       ir  ds:i is:pass
SFX V   r   tissime/_B  ar  ds:a is:pass ds:issim
SFX V   er  itissime/_B er  ds:i is:pass ds:issim
SFX V   r   tissime/_B  ir  ds:i is:pass ds:issim
SFX V   r  r    ar  ds:a is:inf  po:vb
SFX V   r  r    er  ds:e is:inf  po:vb
SFX V   r  r    ir  ds:i is:inf  po:vb
SFX V   r  0    ar  ds:a is:pres po:vb
SFX V   r  0    er  ds:e is:pres po:vb
SFX V   r  0    ir  ds:i is:pres po:vb
SFX V   r  va   ar  ds:a is:pret po:vb
SFX V   r  va   er  ds:e is:pret po:vb
SFX V   r  va   ir  ds:i is:pret po:vb
SFX V   r  ra   ar  ds:a is:fut  po:vb
SFX V   r  ra   er  ds:e is:fut  po:vb
SFX V   r  ra   ir  ds:i is:fut  po:vb
SFX V   r  rea  ar  ds:a is:cond po:vb
SFX V   r  rea  er  ds:e is:cond po:vb
SFX V   r  rea  ir  ds:i is:cond po:vb

SFX W Y 22
SFX W   r   re/_S   er  ds:0 is:inf
SFX W   r   r/_G    er  ds:0 is:inf
SFX W   r   nte/_F      [^cp]er             ds:0 is:actv
SFX W   r   nte/_F      [^ai][cp]er         ds:0 is:actv
SFX W   r   nte/_F      [^fjpsc][ai][cp]er  ds:0 is:actv
SFX W   er  iente/_F    [fjpsc][ai][cp]er   ds:0 is:actv
SFX W   r   ntissime/_B     [^cp]er             ds:0 is:actv ds:issim
SFX W   r   ntissime/_B     [^ai][cp]er         ds:0 is:actv ds:issim
SFX W   r   ntissime/_B     [^fjpsc][ai][cp]er  ds:0 is:actv ds:issim
SFX W   er  ientissime/_B   [fjpsc][ai][cp]er   ds:0 is:actv ds:issim
SFX W   er  ite/_B  er      ds:i is:pass
SFX W   -   e/_B    t-      ds:0 is:pass
SFX W   -   e/_B    [sx]-   ds:0 is:pass
SFX W   er  itissime/_B er      ds:i is:pass
SFX W   -   issime/_B   t-      ds:0 is:pass ds:issim
SFX W   -   issime/_B   [sx]-   ds:0 is:pass ds:issim
SFX W   r   re  er  ds:0 is:inf  po:vb
SFX W   r   r   er  ds:0 is:inf  po:vb
SFX W   r   0   er  ds:0 is:pres po:vb
SFX W   r   va  er  ds:0 is:pret po:vb
SFX W   r   ra  er  ds:0 is:fut  po:vb
SFX W   r   rea er  ds:0 is:cond po:vb

SFX X Y   1
SFX X   0   0/zIKH  .
