Interlingua Spellchecker/InterlinguaSpellCheck/bin/Debug/ia.dic
0me/_OZ
1me/_OZ
2nde/_OZ
3tie/_OZ
4te/_OZ
5te/_OZ
6te/_OZ
7me/_OZ
8ve/_OZ
9ne/_OZ
accrescer/_Wm
acupuncturar/_V
affluer/_Wd
agenese/_T
agiotar/_Vgt
agronomo/_S
alcun/_Q
alicun/_Q
aliquante/_Q
alique/_P
aliqui/_P
aliquid/_P
aliquot/_P
alquante/_Q
alque/_P
alqui/_P
ambe/_Q
amylose/_T
anesthesiologo/_SM
anorthogenese/_T
apophyse/_T
applattar/_Vm
apprehender/_W
aquelle/_Q
aqueste/_Q
arbovirus/_S
aspic/_U
autoanalyse/_T
autodefens-/_W
autoinduction/_S=
avariar/_V
barman/_U
benthos/_S
billion/_SN
biolyse/_T
bobsleigh/_U
brahman/_Soq
brain-storming/_U!
bureau/_U
cablar/_Vt
callite/_T
capillo/_S
cash-flow/_U!
cata/_R
caucalide/_T
ce/_R
celle/_Q
centi/_Nhlp
cerebralisation/_S
certe/_Q
chaperonar/_Vg
chewinggum/_U
cinese/_Tq
cinquanta/_SNhpx
cinque/_SNh
circumflex-/_Wn
clave/_S
cockpit/_U
collis-/_Wnv
compassar/_V
compuls-/_Winv
congruer/_Wd
continer/_Wd
contraception/_S
conversar/_Vbcnt
convolver/_W
corydale/_T
country/_U
crystallo/_Se
cubscout/_U
cuje/_Q
cytogenese/_Tq
deci/_Xl
deci/_Nz
decime/_Oyz
declamar/_Vint
decomponer/_Wbc
decuple/_Ol
densitometro/_S
depilar/_Vijn
deplet-/_Wnv
devolver/_W
diencephalite/_T
digest/_U
disammarrar/_V
discinger/_W
disincrustar/_Vnt
dispers-/_Wnv
distillar/_Vbceint
diverger/_Wd
doryphora/_S
ducenti/_Nhlp
dugout/_U
duo/_SN
duple/_O
ecstase/_Tq
ego/_P
el/_P
ella/_P
emitter/_W
encephalologia/_Sq
endogenese/_T
epiclese/_T
equidistar/_Vd
esse/_Q
este/_Q
etiopathogenese/_T
eudiometro/_S
excider/_W
expropriar/_Vnt
extender/_Wbc
fair play/_U
fistulina/_S
flight recorder/_U
formalisar/_Vbcn
fract-/_Wnu
frottis/_U
gametogenese/_T
gastrula/_S
girl-scout/_U!
granulocytose/_T
guantero/_SM
guastar/_Vt
hall/_U
hemosiderose/_T
heterocyclo/_Sq
hoc/_P
hometrainer/_U
homo/_P
homosynapse/_T
hyperchimera/_S
hypotypose/_T
id/_P
idem/_P
il/_P
ille/_Q
illi/_P
immortalisar/_Vn
imposit-/_Wnt
inflammar/_Vbcinv
infract-/_Wnt
infracultura/_S
interceder/_W
intercom/_U
intonar/_Vnv
introverter/_W
io/_P
is/_P
isse/_Q
iste/_Q
jo/_P
job/_U
knowhow/_U
labrador/_S
ladanum/_T
le/_Q
li/_R
li/_P
linir/_Vm
liquescer/_W
lolio/_S
lor/_Q
lotion/_U
mammite/_T
marmotta/_S
me/_P
mercerisar/_Vgn
metrite/_T
mi/_Q
mi/_P
microbiota/_Sq
mildew/_U
mille/_SN
milliardo/_SN
million/_SN
morphopsychologia/_Sq
mort-/_W
mutar/_Vbcntv
myelofibrose/_T
necun/_Q
nemine/_P
nemo/_P
neopallium/_T
neovitalismo/_S
net/_U
noi/_P
nonagi/_NXly
nonaginta/_Xl
none/_O
nongenti/_Nlp
nonnulle/_Q
nonuple/_Ol
nos/_P
nostre/_Q
novanta/_SNhpx
nove/_SNh
nulle/_Qk
octanta/_SNhpx
octave/_O
octingenti/_Nlp
octo/_SNh
octogi/_NXly
octoginta/_Xl
octuple/_Ol
olecrano/_S
omne/_R
on/_P
oocinese/_T
orthographiar/_V
outcast/_U
ovarite/_T
oxydimetria/_S
paranephrite/_T
patena/_S
pauc/_Qk
peignoir/_U
pelmatozoon/_T
perpetrar/_Vnt
persequer/_Wt
phobotaxe/_T
pineau/_U
plancto/_S
plumpudding/_U
plure/_R
poc/_Q
prearthrose/_T
predefinir/_Vn
preluder/_W
prime/_O
prostrat-/_Wn
prurir/_Vd
psammocarcinoma/_S
puh/_U
pyosclerose/_T
quadragi/_NXly
quadraginta/_Xl
quadringenti/_Nlp
quadruple/_Ol
qual/_Rk
qualcosa/_P
qualcun/_Q
qualcunque/_R
qualque/_R
quante/_Qkq
quaranta/_SNhpx
quarte/_Oy
quatro/_SNh
que/_R
quecunque/_P
quem/_P
qui/_P
quid/_P
quingenti/_Nlp
quinquagi/_NXly
quinquaginta/_Xl
quinte/_Oy
quintuple/_Ol
quod/_P
rayon/_U
reassaltar/_V
recocer/_W
reelect-/_Wnv=
reequilibrar/_V=n
relaxar/_Vmn
repeller/_Wd
resinar/_Vt
retransmitter/_W
rheoscopio/_Sq
rockman/_U
rugir/_V
scout/_Uo
scyphozoon/_T
se/_P
secunde/_O
septanta/_SNhpx
septe/_SNh
septime/_Oy
septingenti/_Nlp
septuagi/_NXly
septuaginta/_Xl
septuple/_Ol
sescenti/_Nlp
sex/_SNh
sexagi/_NXly
sexaginta/_Xl
sexanta/_SNhpx
sexte/_Oy
sextina/_S
sextuple/_Ol
sexualisar/_Vn
sleeping car/_U
solilocut-/_W
steak/_U
strongylose/_T
stuccar/_Vtu
su/_Q
subproduction/_S
suct-/_Wn
sui/_P
syllogisar/_V
tea room/_U
tertie/_Oy
thlaspi/_S
thrombophlebite/_T
ti/_P
torrefact-/_Wnt
tote/_Q
tramway/_U
transfilar/_V
tre/_N
trecenti/_Nlp
tres/_SN
trigi/_NXly
triginta/_Xl
triple/_Ol
tu/_Q
ulle/_Q
un/_N
un/_Qk
unaltere/_P
urolithiase/_T
vegetar/_Vbcnv
veld/_S
vigi/_NXly
viginti/_SXl
vinti/_NAhpx
voi/_P
vostre/_Q
whig/_U
yo/_P
